Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 291.5 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created the State Employee Compensation


Board.


B. The Board shall consist of the following members, who shall


serve for two-year terms:


1. Three members appointed by the Governor;


2. Two members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the


Senate;



Req. No. 2853 Page 1


3. Two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of


Representatives;


4. One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate;


and


5. One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of


Representatives.


C. 1. The Board shall meet in odd-numbered years and recommend


adjustments to salaries, benefit allowances, and other compensation


for state employees. Such recommendations shall be made by a


majority vote of the Board.


2. The Board’s recommendations shall be electronically


transmitted to the Governor, President Pro Tempore of the Senate,


Speaker of the House of Representatives, Minority Leader of the


Senate, and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2853 MSBB 12/11/2025 8:44:51 AM















Req. No. 2853 Page 2